Maine, session 132, LD430.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §634, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Dam removal; moratorium. Notwithstanding subsection 4 or any other provision
of this subarticle to the contrary, the department may not approve an application for a
permit to remove a dam that is part of a hydropower project.
This subsection is repealed January 1, 2027.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §902, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 630, §3, is amended to
read:
1. Consultation required. Within 180 210 days of filing a petition pursuant to section
901, a dam owner shall consult with the persons and entities listed in subsection 3 to
determine whether any of them wish to assume ownership of the dam. During consultation
with each person or group of persons, the owner shall explain the process set forth in this
article and shall inform the person or group that the department may issue an order
requiring release of the water impounded by the dam if a new owner is not located. A dam
owner may meet the obligation to consult with property owners by holding a public meeting
and consulting with the persons who appear at that meeting, as long as notice has been sent
to each property owner as required in section 901.
Page 1 - 132LR0191(01)

Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §902, sub-§1-A, as corrected by RR 2013, c. 2, §48, is amended
to read:
1-A. Extension of consultation period. The consultation period under subsection 1
must be extended for an additional 180 210 days if:
A. A municipality in which the dam or impoundment is located applies to the
department for an extension and demonstrates that the municipality needs additional
consultation time to facilitate an agreement for municipal ownership of the dam; or
B. The dam owner applies to the department for an extension.
The consultation period under subsection 1 may not be extended for more than 180 210
days regardless of the number of applications for extension under this subsection.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §902, sub-§4, as amended by PL 1997, c. 789, §2 and affected
by §5, is further amended to read:
4. Report on notice compliance. The dam owner shall file a report with the
department within 180 210 days of filing a petition that includes:
A. Evidence that the owner complied with the notice requirements set forth in section
901; and
B. Names and addresses of persons notified under section 901.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §902, sub-§4-A, as corrected by RR 1997, c. 2, §64, is amended
to read:
4-A. Report on consultation process. The dam owner shall file a report with the
department within 180 210 days of filing a petition or before the conclusion of an extension
to the consultation period granted pursuant to subsection 1‑A that includes:
A. Names and addresses of parties consulted in accordance with this section; and
B. The results of the consultations and whether a new owner has been located.
Sec. 6. 38 MRSA §903, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 630, §3 and amended
by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended to read:
2. Evaluation of fisheries and wildlife value. Within 60 90 days of receiving notice
under subsection 1, the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife shall review the
following factors and determine whether the best interest of the public requires that
department to assume ownership of the dam:
A. The cost of maintaining the dam;
B. The value to fisheries and wildlife of maintaining the dam; and
C. The value to fisheries and wildlife of releasing water from the dam.
The Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife shall notify the department of its
determination. If the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife determines, after
considering these factors, that the best interest of the public requires it to assume ownership
of the dam, the department shall issue an order directing the dam owner to transfer the dam
to the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife within a reasonable period of time. If
the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife determines that it will not assume
Page 2 - 132LR0191(01)

410 ownership, the department shall notify the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
421 Forestry.
Sec. 7. 38 MRSA §903, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 630, §3 and amended
by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended to read:
3. Evaluation of public recreational value. Within 60 90 days of receiving notice
under subsection 2, the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry shall review
the following factors and determine whether the best interest of the public requires that
department to assume ownership of the dam:
A. The cost of maintaining the dam;
B. The value to public recreation, conservation and public use of maintaining the dam;
and
C. The value to public recreation, conservation and public use of releasing water from
the dam.
The Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry shall notify the department of
its determination. If the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry determines,
after considering these factors, that the best interest of the public requires it to assume
ownership of the dam, the department shall issue an order directing the dam owner to
transfer the property to the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry within a
reasonable period of time. If the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry
determines that it will not assume ownership of the dam, the department shall notify the
Maine Emergency Management Agency.
Sec. 8. 38 MRSA §903, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 630, §3, is amended to
read:
4. Evaluation of public safety value. Within 60 90 days of receipt of notice under
subsection 3, the Maine Emergency Management Agency shall review the following
factors and determine whether the best interest of the public requires that agency to assume
ownership of the dam:
A. The cost of maintaining the dam;
B. The value to public safety, particularly flood protection, of maintaining the dam;
and
C. The value to public safety, particularly flood protection, of releasing water from the
dam.
The Maine Emergency Management Agency shall notify the department of its
determination. If that agency determines, after considering these factors, that the best
interest of the public requires it to assume ownership of the dam, the department shall issue
an order directing the dam owner to transfer ownership of the dam to the Maine Emergency
Management Agency within a reasonable period of time.
Sec. 9. 38 MRSA §905, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Water release order; moratorium. Notwithstanding subsection 1 or any other
provision of this article to the contrary, the department may not issue an order to a dam
owner to release water from the dam pursuant to subsection 1 and may not, at the request
Page 3 - 132LR0191(01)

412 of the dam owner, otherwise authorize or approve the removal of a dam governed by this
423 article.
This subsection is repealed January 1, 2027.
Sec. 10. Department of Environmental Protection; report. The Department
of Environmental Protection shall evaluate options for implementation of processes,
programs or initiatives to address negative outcomes that may be experienced by
municipalities, businesses and property owners upon the removal of, or significant change
in, water flows from a hydropower or nonhydropower dam, including, but not limited to,
interruptions in or loss of water supply for adjacent municipalities and businesses and
damage to or impairment of public and private property and infrastructure resulting from
dam removal or change in water flows. In conducting the evaluation under this section, the
department may, as necessary, consult with relevant agencies and other stakeholders,
including, but not limited to, the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry,
the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife and the Department of Defense, Veterans
and Emergency Management, Maine Emergency Management Agency. On or before
January 1, 2026, the department shall submit to the Joint Standing Committee on
Environment and Natural Resources a report outlining the department's evaluation under
this section and including its recommendations along with draft legislation as necessary.
After reviewing the report, the committee may report out legislation relating to the report
to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.